Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2818.03
Drug product select, defined.

Drug product select means to dispense, without the practitioner's express authorization, an equivalent drug product or an interchangeable biological product in place of the brand-name drug or the biological product contained in a medical order of such practitioner.

Laws 2017, LB481, § 8.